Massachusetts, session 194th, SD4055.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 20C the following section: 
Section 20D. Reliance on Written Representations of Boards Concerning the Purchase or 
Establishment of Creditable Service.   
(a) As used in this section, "written representation" means a written statement, letter, 
notice, estimate or other document issued by a board, or by an employee or authorized agent of a 
board acting within the scope of their job duties, that is addressed to a specific member or 
beneficiary and that sets forth the board's position, interpretation or application of this chapter, 
any rule or regulation under it, or the board’s practice, relating to the member’s prospective or 
pending purchase or establishment of creditable service. This includes, but is not limited to, a 
written statement concerning: (i) the member’s eligibility to purchase or establish creditable 

of 4 12 service; (ii) the amount of creditable service that may be purchased or established; (iii) the cost 
of such purchase or establishment, including the applicable interest rate; (iv) the time or manner 
of payment; or (v) the effect of the purchase or establishment on the member's group 
classification or on the amount, calculation or effective date of any retirement allowance or other 
benefit. A notice of benefits furnished pursuant to paragraph (k) of subdivision (5) of section 20 
is a written representation for the purposes of this section to the extent that it addresses of these 
matters. A general publication, guide, summary or website posting that is not addressed to a 
specific member or beneficiary is not a written representation.  
(b) A member, whether active or inactive, or a beneficiary who receives a written 
representation is entitled to rely on it as provided in subsection (c).  
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including paragraph (c) of 
subdivision (5) of section 20, if a member or beneficiary reasonably relies on a written 
representation and acts or decides not to act, because of that representation, the board shall apply 
the law, rule, regulation or practice as stated in the written representation in determining the 
member’s or beneficiary’ rights, obligations and benefits under this chapter regarding the matters 
addressed, including any interest rate or calculation method stated, even if the representation was 
incorrect when made or later turns out to conflict with the law or the board’s correct 
interpretation;  provided, however, that this subsection does not apply if: (i) the member or 
beneficiary obtained the representation by fraud; or (ii) the representation was based on incorrect 
information provided by the member or beneficiary.  
(d) A board may correct a written representation by sending a corrected written 
representation to the member or beneficiary to whom the original representation was addressed; 

of 4 34 provided, however, that the correction may not affect the rights of the member or beneficiary 
under subsection (c) who, before receiving the corrected representation, reasonably relied on the 
original representation and: (i) made a payment to the system or entered into an agreement to 
purchase or establish creditable service; (ii) retired or filed an application for retirement; (iii) 
made an irrevocable election; (iv) separated from service; or (v) deferred a decision or election at 
the time the representation was made and later sought to act on the basis of the original written 
representation.  
(e) A benefit paid or payable under a written representation that governs pursuant to 
subsection (c) or subsection (d) is not an error for the purposes of paragraph (c) of subdivision 
(5) of section 20. If applying a written representation under this section results in a benefit 
greater than what would otherwise be payable under this chapter, the difference shall be paid 
from system funds like any other benefit and shall not be recoverable from the member or 
beneficiary.  
(f) When a member or beneficiary, or their authorized representative, makes a written 
request for information about purchasing or establishing of creditable service, the board shall 
acknowledge such request within 10 business days of its receipt and shall furnish a written 
representation responsive to such request within 30 days of its receipt; provided, however, that if 
the board requires records or information from a current or former employer, from another 
retirement system or from any other third party to respond, the board shall so notify the member 
or beneficiary within the same 30-day period and provide written representation within 30 days 
after receiving the necessary records or information.  

of 4 55  (g) A member or beneficiary aggrieved by a board decision under this section may appeal 
pursuant to subdivision (4) of section 16.  
(h) The public employee retirement administration commission may issue rules and 
regulations to implement this section, including standard forms for written representations, 
corrected written representations and acknowledgments under subsection (f).  
SECTION 2. Section 20D of chapter 32 of the General Laws applies to written 
representations issued on or after March 1, 2020.